New York, session 2025-2026, A7767.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The section heading of section 804 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 390 of the laws of 2016, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 5-a is added to read as follows: 4 Health education regarding mental health, alcohol, drugs, tobacco 5 abuse [and], the prevention and detection of certain cancers, and 6 instruction concerning human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune 7 deficiency syndrome. 8 5-a. Instruction regarding human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and 9 acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), including but not limited to 10 medically accurate information concerning the nature of such diseases, 11 methods of transmission, and methods of prevention shall be provided in 12 all elementary and secondary schools. Any such course shall be taught by 13 teachers holding a certificate to teach health. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02941-01-5